Washington statutes.
RCW 44.28.810

Review of governor's interagency coordinating council on health disparities—Report to the legislature.

The joint committee shall conduct a review of the governor's interagency coordinating council on health disparities and its functions. The review shall be substantially the same as a sunset review under chapter 43.131 RCW. The joint committee shall present its findings to appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2016.

[ 2006 c 239 s 7.]